Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 30. Bail.
Sec. 12.30.050.
Release of material witnesses.

If the prosecution or defense establishes by affidavit or other evidence that the testimony of a person is material in a criminal proceeding, and that it may be impracticable to secure the presence of the person by subpoena, a judicial officer may order the arrest of the person and consider the release or detention of the person under the provisions of AS

12.30.011

.

A material witness may not be detained because of inability to comply with any condition of release if the testimony of the witness can adequately be secured by deposition, unless further detention is necessary to prevent a failure of justice.

Release of a material witness under (a) of this section may be delayed for a reasonable period of time for the deposition of the witness to be taken.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1966; am § 12 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, rewrote the section.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(d), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the provisions of the 2010 repeal and reenactment of this section apply “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.055.
Persons appearing on petition to revoke.

A person who is in custody in connection with a petition to revoke probation for a felony crime against a person under AS 11.41 does not have a right to be released under this chapter. A judicial officer may, however, release the person under the provisions of this chapter, if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the proposed release conditions will reasonably assure the appearance of the person and the safety of the victim, other persons, and the community.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 13 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 64 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (b), see sec. 185(e), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (b).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.060.
Penalties for failure to appear. [Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 12.30.070.
Contempt.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a court from exercising its power to punish for contempt.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1966)

Sec. 12.30.075.
Forfeited cash and other securities.

Cash or other security posted by a person under AS

12.30.011

that would otherwise be forfeited shall be held by the court in trust for the benefit of the victim if, within 30 days after an order of the court establishing a failure to appear or a violation of conditions of release, the prosecuting authority gives notice that restitution may be requested as part of the sentence if the person is convicted.

If a restitution order is not entered, the court shall order the cash or other security being held in trust to be forfeited to the state.

If a restitution order is entered, the court shall apply the cash or other security to the satisfaction of the order. If the cash or other security held in trust is applied to an order of restitution, the court shall issue a separate judgment against the defendant in favor of the state in the amount that would have otherwise been forfeited, and any cash or other security remaining after payment of the restitution shall be applied against that judgment. Any cash or other security remaining shall be forfeited to the state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 14 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “person under AS

12.30.011

” for “defendant under AS

12.30.020

” and “person” for “defendant” following “part of the sentence if the”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(e), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a) of this section “apply to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.078.
Conviction occurrence.

In this chapter, a conviction occurs at the time the person is found guilty, either by plea or verdict, of the offense.

History.

(§ 15 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.080.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“judicial officer” means a person authorized to release a person pending trial, sentencing, or pending appeal;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“offense” means any criminal offense;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“sexual felony” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

;

“stalking” means a violation of AS

11.41.260

or

11.41.270

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1966; am § 16 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (1) and (3) were enacted as (3) and (4); renumbered in 2010 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, added definitions of “crime involving domestic violence”, “knowingly”, “peace officer”, “sexual felony”, and “stalking”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(e), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to this section “apply to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2010.”